en: Bottle Openers
xx: Bottle Openers
cs: Otvíráky
da: Oplukkere
de: Flaschenöffner
es: Abridores
fr: Décapsuleurs
it: Apribottiglie
ja: 栓抜き
nl: Flessenopeners
no: Flaskeåpnere
pl: Otwieracze do butelek
pt: Abridores de garrafa
ru: Открывалки для бутылок
sv: Flasköppnare
tr: Açacaklar

en: Cocktail Shakers
xx: Cocktail Shakers
cs: Šejkry
da: Cocktailshakere
de: Cocktailshaker
es: Cocteleras
fr: Shakers
it: Shaker da cocktail
ja: ドリンクシェーカー
nl: Cocktailshakers
no: Drinkshakere
pl: Shakery do drinków
pt: Coqueteleiras
ru: Шейкеры
sv: Drinkshakers
tr: Kokteyl Çalkalayıcılar

en: Cocktail Strainers
xx: Cocktail Strainers
cs: Koktejlová sítka
da: Cocktailsier
de: Barsiebe
es: Gusanillos para colar cócteles
fr: Passoires à cocktails
it: Colini da cocktail
ja: カクテルストレーナー
nl: Cocktailzeven
no: Drinksiler
pl: Sitka barowe
pt: Coadores de coquetel
ru: Стрейнеры
sv: Cocktailsilar
tr: Kokteyl Süzgeçleri

en: Muddlers
xx: Muddlers
cs: Barové macerovací paličky
da: Mortere
de: Cocktailstößel
es: Maza de mortero
fr: Pilons
it: Pestello da barman
ja: マドラー
nl: Muddlers
no: Drinkmortere
pl: Rozgniatacze do owoców
pt: Pilões
ru: Мадлеры
sv: Muddlare
tr: Havanlar

en: Corkscrews
xx: Corkscrews
cs: Vývrtky
da: Proptrækkere
de: Korkenzieher
es: Sacacorchos
fr: Tire-bouchons
it: Cavatappi
ja: コルク抜き
nl: Kurkentrekkers
no: Korketrekkere
pl: Korkociągi
pt: Saca-rolhas
ru: Штопоры
sv: Korkskruvar
tr: Tirbuşonlar

en: Decanters
xx: Decanters
cs: Karafy
da: Dekantering
de: Dekanter
es: Decantadores
fr: Carafes
it: Caraffe
ja: デカンタ
nl: Karaffen
no: Vinkarafler
pl: Karafki
pt: Decantadores
ru: Графины
sv: Karaffer
tr: Şarap Sürahileri

en: Foil Cutters
xx: Foil Cutters
cs: Řezáky na fólie
da: Foliskærere
de: Folienschneider
es: Cortacápsulas
fr: Coupe-papier aluminium
it: Taglia pellicola alluminio
ja: ホイルカッター
nl: Foliesnijders
no: Foliekuttere
pl: Noże do folii
pt: Cortadores de alumínio
ru: Резаки для фольги
sv: Folieskärare
tr: Folyo Kesiciler

en: Wine Aerators
xx: Wine Aerators
cs: Provzdušňovače na víno
da: Vinluftere
de: Weindekantierer
es: Oxigenadores de vino
fr: Aérateurs de vin
it: Aeratori per vino
ja: ワインエアレーター
nl: Decanteerders
no: Vinluftere
pl: Aeratory do wina
pt: Aeradores de vinho
ru: Аэраторы для вина
sv: Vinluftare
tr: Şarap Havalandırıcılar

en: Wine Bottle Holders
xx: Wine Bottle Holders
cs: Stojany na láhev
da: Vinflaskeholdere
de: Weinflaschenhalter
es: Soportes para botellas de vino
fr: Porte-bouteilles de vin
it: Portabottiglie
ja: ワインボトルホルダー
nl: Wijnfleshouders
no: Vinflaskeholdere
pl: Stojaki na wino
pt: Suportes para garrafas de vinho
ru: Держатели для винных бутылок
sv: Vinflaskhållare
tr: Şarap Şişesi Tutucular

en: Wine Glass Charms
xx: Wine Glass Charms
cs: Ozdoby na sklenky na víno
da: Vinglas – pynt
de: Weinglasanhänger
es: Adornos para copas de vino
fr: Marque-verres
it: Decorazioni per bicchieri da vino
ja: ワイングラスチャーム
nl: Wijnglasringen
no: Vinglassamuletter
pl: Zawieszki do kieliszków do wina
pt: Pingentes para taças de vinho
ru: Подвески для бокалов
sv: Vinglashängen
tr: Şarap Bardağı Süsleri

en: Cookware & Bakeware
xx: Cookware & Bakeware
cs: Nádobí na vaření a pečení
da: Kogegrej og bageforme
de: Kochgeschirr & Backformen
es: Utensilios para cocinar y para hornear
fr: Matériel de cuisson et de pâtisserie
it: Pentolame e tegami da forno
ja: 調理器具
nl: Kookgerei en bakvormen
no: Koke- og bakeutstyr
pl: Garnki i formy do pieczenia
pt: Panelas e assadeiras
ru: Кухонная посуда и жаростойкие формы
sv: Verktyg för matlagning och bakning
tr: Ocak ve Fırında Pişirme Gereçleri

en: Bakeware
xx: Bakeware
cs: Nádobí na pečení
da: Bageforme
de: Backformen
es: Utensilios para hornear
fr: Moules à pâtisserie
it: Tegami da forno
ja: ベイクウェア
nl: Bakproducten
no: Bakeutstyr
pl: Formy do pieczenia
pt: Assadeiras
ru: Жаропрочная посуда
sv: Bakningsverktyg
tr: Fırında Pişirme Gereçleri

en: Bakeware Sets
xx: Bakeware Sets
cs: Sady na pečení
da: Bageforme – sæt
de: Backzubehörsets
es: Juegos de utensilios para hornear
fr: Lots de moules à pâtisserie
it: Set accessori da forno
ja: オーブンウェアセット
nl: Sets voor bakproducten
no: Sett med bakeutstyr
pl: Zestawy form do pieczenia
pt: Conjuntos para assadeiras
ru: Наборы жаропрочной посуды
sv: Verktygsset för bakning
tr: Fırında Pişirme Gereci Setleri

en: Baking & Cookie Sheets
xx: Baking & Cookie Sheets
cs: Formy na pečení a bábovky
da: Bageplader
de: Back- & Plätzchenbleche
es: Bandejas para hornear galletas
fr: Plaques à pâtisserie
it: Carta da forno e per biscotti
ja: 天板・オーブンシート
nl: Bakvellen
no: Bakeplater
pl: Blachy do pieczenia
pt: Travessas para assar
ru: Противни для выпечки
sv: Ugnsplåtar
tr: Fırında Pişirme ve Kurabiye Kağıtları

en: Bread Pans & Molds
xx: Bread Pans & Molds
cs: Pánve a formy na pečení chleba
da: Brødforme
de: Brotbackformen
es: Moldes para pan
fr: Moules à pain
it: Teglie e stampi per pane
ja: パン焼き型
nl: Broodblikken en -vormen
no: Brødformer
pl: Formy do chleba
pt: Formas para pães
ru: Формы и противни для выпечки хлеба
sv: Brödformar
tr: Ekmek Tavaları ve Kalıpları

en: Broiling Pans
xx: Broiling Pans
cs: Grilovací pánve
da: Grillpander
de: Grillbleche mit Fettpfannen
es: Bandejas para grill
fr: Grilloirs
it: Pentole per griglia
ja: ブロイラーパン
nl: Braadpannen
no: Grillpanner
pl: Tace do podgrzewania bezpośrednio na ogniu
pt: Grelhas de forno
ru: Противни для жарки
sv: Stekplåtar
tr: Kavurma Tavaları

en: Cake Pans & Molds
xx: Cake Pans & Molds
cs: Dortové formy
da: Kageforme
de: Kuchenbackformen
es: Moldes para tartas
fr: Moules à gâteaux
it: Teglie e stampi per torte
ja: ケーキ焼き型
nl: Cakevormen en -blikken
no: Kakeformer
pl: Formy do ciasta
pt: Formas e moldes para bolos
ru: Формы для тортов
sv: Bakformar
tr: Kek Tepsileri ve Kalıpları

en: Muffin & Pastry Pans
xx: Muffin & Pastry Pans
cs: Formy na dortíky a koláčky
da: Muffin- og cupcakeforme
de: Muffin- & Gebäckformen
es: Moldes para magdalenas
fr: Moules à muffins et pâtisserie
it: Teglie per muffin e tortine
ja: マフィン型
nl: Muffin- en cakevormen
no: Muffins- og kakeformer
pl: Foremki do muffinów lub babeczek
pt: Formas para muffins e bolos pequenos
ru: Формы для кексов и маффинов
sv: Muffinsplåtar
tr: Kek ve Hamur İşi Tavaları

en: Pie & Quiche Pans
xx: Pie & Quiche Pans
cs: Formy na koláče
da: Tærteforme
de: Kuchen- & Quichebackformen
es: Moldes para quiche y tarta
fr: Moules à tarte et quiche
it: Teglie per torte e quiche
ja: パイ型・タルト型
nl: Taart- en quichevormen
no: Pai- og quiche-former
pl: Formy do tarty i kiszu
pt: Formas para tortas e quiches
ru: Формы для открытых пирогов
sv: Paj- och quicheplåtar
tr: Pasta ve Quiche Tavaları

en: Pizza Pans
xx: Pizza Pans
cs: Plechy na pizzu
da: Pizzapander
de: Pizzableche
es: Moldes para pizza
fr: Moules à pizza
it: Teglie per pizza
ja: ピザプレート
nl: Pizzapannen
no: Pizzapanner
pl: Formy do pizzy
pt: Formas para pizza
ru: Формы для пиццы
sv: Pizzaformar
tr: Pizza Tavaları